pt-BR: Mesa tipo de base: Pernas cruzadas (base X); Pedestal duplo; Tambor; Quatro pernas; Pedestal; Cavalete; Cavalete; Outro
lt-LT: Stalo pagrindo tipas: Sukryžiuotos kojos (X formos pagrindas); Dvigubas pjedestalas; Būgno formos; Keturių kojų; Pjedestalo tipo; Ožio formos; Su atrama (estakados tipo); Kita
pl: Typ podstawy stołu: Nogi krzyżowe (podstawa w kształcie litery X); Podwójny cokół (podwójna kolumna); Bębnowa; Czteronożna; Pojedynczy cokół (kolumna); Kozłowa; Typu trestle (z belką); Inny
tr: Tablo taban tipi: Çapraz ayak (X taban); Çift sütun ayak; Silindir; Dört ayaklı; Sütun; Testere tezgahı; Sehpa ayaklı; Diğer
nb: Bordbasetype: Kryssben (X-fot); Dobbel pidestall; Tromme; Fire ben; Pidestall; Bukk; Bukk; Annet
hr-HR: Vrsta baze stola: Prekrižene noge (X-baza); Dvostruko postolje; Bubanj; Četiri noge; Postolje; Nogare; Trestle stalak; Ostalo
zh-TW: 桌腳座類型: 交叉腳 (X 型底座); 雙柱底座; 鼓型; 四腳; 單柱底座; 鋸木架型; 棧橋式; 其他
zh-CN: 桌底类型: 交叉腿（X 形底座）; 双台柱; 鼓形; 四腿; 台柱式; 锯木架形; 栈桥式; 其他
ko: 테이블 받침대 유형: 교차형 다리(X-베이스); 이중 페데스탈; 드럼; 4-레그; 페데스탈; 쏘호스; 트레슬; 기타
sk-SK: Typ základne stola: Prekrížené nohy (v tvare X); Dvojitý podstavec; Valec; Štvornohý; Podstavec; Koza; Stojanový; Iný
ru: Тип основания стола: Перекрестные ножки (X-образное основание); Двойная стойка; Барабан; Четыре ножки; Стойка-пьедестал; Козлы; Эстакада; Другое
da: Bordbasetype: Krydsben (X-fod); Dobbelt piedestal; Tromme; Firebenet; Piedestal; Savbuk; Bukke; Andet
en: Table base type: Cross-leg (X-base); Double pedestal; Drum; Four-leg; Pedestal; Sawhorse; Trestle; Other
vi: Loại cơ sở bảng: Chân chéo (chữ X); Bệ kép; Hình trống; Bốn chân; Bệ đỡ; Chân chữ A; Chân giá đỡ; Khác
fr: Type de piètement de table: Pieds croisés (base en X); Double piédestal; Tambour; À quatre pieds; Piédestal; Tréteau; Tréteaux; Autre
cs: Typ podnože ke stolům: Křížová (podnož X); Dvojitý podstavec; Buben; Čtyřnohá; Podstavec; Kozlík; Kozová podnož; Jiné
sl-SI: Vrsta podstavka mize: Prekrižane noge (podstavek X); Dvojni steber (pedestal); Boben; Štiri noge; Centralni steber; Oblika koze za žaganje; Podstavek s prečko; Drugo
hu: Asztallap típusa: Keresztlábas (X-talpú); Dupla oszloplábas; Dob; Négylábú; Oszloplábas; Baklábas; Keresztgerendás; Egyéb
el: Τύπος βάσης τραπεζιού: Σταυρωτά πόδια (βάση X); Διπλή κεντρική βάση; Τύμπανο; Τέσσερα πόδια; Κεντρική βάση; Τρίποδο (sawhorse); Βάση με δοκό; Άλλο
bg-BG: Тип на основата на масата: Кръстосани крака (X-основа); Двоен пиедестал; Барабан; С четири крака; Пиедестал; Тип магаре; Естакада; Друго
pt-PT: Tipo de base da mesa: Pernas cruzadas (base em X); Pedestal duplo; Tambor; Quatro pernas; Pedestal; Cavalete; Estrutura de cavaletes; Outro
it: Tipo di base del tavolo: Gambe incrociate (base a X); Doppio piedistallo; A tamburo; A quattro gambe; Piedistallo; A cavalletto; A fratina; Altro
fi: Pöydän pohjan tyyppi: Ristijalat (X-jalusta); Kaksoisjalusta; Rumpu; Nelijalkainen; Keskiöjalusta; Pukkijalusta; Pukkijalat; Muu
sv: Typ av bordsbas: Korslagda ben (X-bas); Dubbel pelare; Trumma; Fyra ben; Pelare; Sågbock; Bock; Annan
es: Tipo de base de la mesa: Patas cruzadas (base en X); Doble pedestal; Tambor; Cuatro patas; Pedestal; Caballete; Caballete; Otra
th: ฐานโต๊ะแบบ: ขาไขว้ (ฐานรูปตัวX); ฐานคู่; ทรงกลอง; สี่ขา; ฐานเดี่ยว; ทรงม้าเลื่อยไม้; ขาหยั่ง; อื่นๆ
nl: Tafelbasis type: Gekruiste poten (X-poot); Dubbele kolomvoet; Trommel; Vier poten; Kolomvoet; Schraag; Schraagpoot; Overig
de: Art des Tischgestells: Überkreuzte Beine (X-Gestell); Doppelsäule; Trommel; Vierfuß; Säule; Sägebock; Bockgestell; Sonstige
ja: テーブルベースタイプ: クロスレッグ (Xベース); ダブルペデスタル; ドラム; 4本脚; ペデスタル; ソーホース; トレストル; その他
ro-RO: Tipul de bază al mesei: Picioare în cruce (bază X); Piedestal dublu; Cilindru; Patru picioare; Piedestal; Capră; Cadru cu traverse; Altele